California, session 20252026, AB2588.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3959 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:3959. (a) The directors shall be appointed by the Governor.(b) (1) If the Governor has not filled a vacancy on the board of directors within 90 days and the board of directors has insufficient membership to establish a quorum, the board of directors may temporarily appoint a director to fill the vacancy and to establish a quorum, consistent with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(2) The term of office for a temporary director temporarily appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be consistent with Section 3960, except that the Governor, consistent with this chapter, may appoint a different director to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term upon which the temporary director shall no longer be on the board of directors.(3) Any eligibility requirements imposed pursuant to this chapter shall apply to a temporary director appointed pursuant to paragraph (1).